Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.810

Funeral and cemetery account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5294-S.SL) ***

The funeral and cemetery account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fines and fees collected under this chapter and chapter 68.05 RCW must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to carry out the duties required for the operation and enforcement of this chapter and chapter 68.05 RCW. Only the director of licensing or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. During the 2017-2019 biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the funeral and cemetery account to the skeletal human remains assistance account.

[ 2018 c 299 s 919; 2009 c 102 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 299: See note following RCW 43.41.433.

Funeral directors and embalmers account and cemetery account abolished, moneys transferred to funeral and cemetery account—2009 c 102: "Any residual balance of funds remaining in the funeral directors and embalmers account and the cemetery account must be transferred to the funeral and cemetery account established in section 24 of this act. The treasurer shall make the transfer after being notified by the office of financial management that it has completed the financial statement for fiscal year 2009, and no later than December 31, 2009." [ 2009 c 102 s 25.]